Maryland, session 2026, HB0060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–141.
(A) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION:
(1) SHALL PROVIDE REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS TO A STUDENT
WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE; AND
(2) MAY NOT DENY ACCESS TO FACILITIES OR SERVICES TO A
STUDENT BASED ON THE STUDENT’S DIAGNOSIS OF SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
(B) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL ESTABLISH A CLEAR
AND ACCESSIBLE PROCEDURE THROUGH WHICH A PERSON MAY REPORT AN
ALLEGED VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL PUBLICIZE IN A
MANNER THAT IS CLEAR AND ACCESSIBLE TO STUDENTS:
(1) THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE REPORTING PROCEDURE ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Health – General
18–510.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE
TREATMENT PROVIDERS AND COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATIONS, SHALL
DEVELOP AN EDUCATION AND AWARENESS CAMPAIGN FOR INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE REGARDING STUDENTS WITH SICKLE CELL
DISEASE.

HOUSE BILL 60 3
(B) THE CAMPAIGN DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) DESCRIBE CHALLENGES FACED BY YOUNG ADULTS LIVING WITH
SICKLE CELL DISEASE, WITH PARTICULAR EMPHASIS ON CHALLENGES ARISING
DURING SICKLE CELL DISEASE–RELATED HEALTH CRISES AND OTHER CHRONIC
CONDITIONS THAT MAY COMPOUND THESE CHALLENGES; AND
(2) PROVIDE INFORMATION ON ACCOMMODATIONS AND SUPPORT
THAT INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION CAN OFFER TO STUDENTS WITH SICKLE
CELL DISEASE TO ENABLE THE STUDENTS TO SUCCEED ACADEMICALLY WHILE
EFFECTIVELY MANAGING SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
18–511.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND HIGHER
EDUCATION COMMISSION, THE STATEWIDE STEERING COMMITTEE ON SICKLE
CELL DISEASE, AND SICKLE CELL DISEASE COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS BASED IN
THE STATE, SHALL DEVELOP A FRAMEWORK AND PROCEDURES FOR INSTITUTIONS
OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE TO FOLLOW IN ASSESSING, SUPPORTING, AND
TREATING STUDENTS WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT, THE MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION
COMMISSION, AND THE STATEWIDE STEERING COMMITTEE ON SICKLE CELL
DISEASE JOINTLY SHALL:
(1) BEGINNING DECEMBER 1, 2026, PROVIDE TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE TO INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO:
(I) IMPLEMENT THE PROCEDURES DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
(II) INSTRUCT PERSONNEL OF INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION REGARDING THE PROCEDURES DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, DEVELOP A PROCESS TO
MONITOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROCEDURES BY INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION.
18–512.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATEWIDE
STEERING COMMITTEE ON SICKLE CELL DISEASE AND SICKLE CELL DISEASE

HOUSE BILL 60
COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS BASED IN THE STATE, SHALL DEVELOP OR COMPILE
MATERIALS TO PROVIDE HEALTH PERSONNEL, FACULTY, AND ADMINISTRATIVE
STAFF EMPLOYED AT AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE WITH
A COMPREHENSIVE EDUCATION ON SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
(B) THE MATERIALS DEVELOPED OR COMPILED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE DESIGNED TO ENHANCE UNDERSTANDING OF SICKLE CELL DISEASE,
REDUCE STIGMAS, AND PROMOTE AN ALL–ENCOMPASSING AND SUPPORTIVE
LEARNING ENVIRONMENT FOR STUDENTS WITH SICKLE CELL DISEASE.
(C) EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IS ENCOURAGED TO
CONDUCT PERIODIC ASSESSMENTS, SURVEILLANCE ACTIVITIES, AWARENESS
CAMPAIGNS, AND EDUCATIONAL SESSIONS BASED ON THE MATERIALS DEVELOPED
OR COMPILED UNDER THIS SECTION AS FINANCIAL RESOURCES ALLOW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.